District of Columbia statutes.
42-3531.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Office of the Chief Tenant Advocate Establishment Act”.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2061, 52 DCR 7503
Oct. 1, 2007, D.C. Law 16-181, § 2(a), 53 DCR 6703
D.C. Law 16-181 deleted “of 2005” following “Act”.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2061 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
Section 5 of D.C. Law 16-181 provided: “Section 2 through 4 shall apply as of October 1, 2007.”